Illinois, session 104th, HB2574.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Assessment reporting transparency. 8    (a) On or before July 1, 2025 and each fiscal year 9thereafter, the State Board of Education shall report, for 10each assessment contract the State Board of Education enters 11into, all of the following:12        (1) the effective date of the contract and the date 13    the contract concludes;14        (2) whether the contract includes any renewal options 15    and, if so, the length and number of renewals;16        (3) the total contract costs on a yearly basis; and17        (4) the notice of communications with the vendor to 18    exercise renewal options.19    (b) The State Board of Education shall compile the 20information required under subsection (a) and make that 21information available to the public on its Internet website.22    (c) To further enhance the transparency around 23assessments, the State Board of Education shall engage with   HB2574 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03467 LNS 13490 b1stakeholder groups, such as the committee appointed under 2Section 2-3.64a-5 and the Balanced Accountability Measure 3Committee created in Section 2-3.25a, other State Board of 4Education established groups, such as the Technical Advisory 5Committee, and any other relevant entities established after 6the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly. 8    (d) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 9necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this 10Section.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.